Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.060

Brands similar to governmental brands not to be recorded.

No brand shall be recorded for ownership purposes which will be applied in the same location and is similar or identical to a brand used or reserved for ownership or health purposes by a governmental agency or the agent of such an agency.

[ 1959 c 54 s 6.]